Utah statutes.
77-30-17.   Procedure when no arrest made under warrant of governor.

If the accused is not arrested under warrant of the governor by the expiration of the time specified in the warrant or bond, a judge or magistrate may discharge him or may recommit him for a further period not to exceed 60 days, or a judge or magistrate may again take bail for his appearance and surrender, as provided in Section 77-30-16, but within a period not to exceed 60 days after the date of such new bond.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

